Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.768

[Art. 114] Dueling.

Any person subject to this code who fights or promotes, or is concerned in or connives at fighting a duel, or who, having knowledge of a challenge sent or about to be sent, fails to report the fact promptly to the proper authority, shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 111.]